Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB354.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the "What Is Your Pennsylvania Story" Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Education of the Commonwealth."Guidelines." The guidelines developed under section 3(a).<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718 "Professional educator." As defined in section 1205.2(o) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949."School entity." A school district, intermediate unit, area career and technical school, charter school, cyber charter school, regional charter school or nonpublic school."Social studies." As defined in 22 Pa. Code § 4.12(a)(3) (relating to academic standards)."What Is Your Pennsylvania Story." The understanding and observance of religious freedom and the unique lived experiences that a student and the family of the student bring to the Pennsylvania story, which may include:(1) Awareness of views on an individual's ancestral culture.(2) Attitudes on cultural differences.(3) Cross-cultural skills.Section 3. Guidelines.(a) Development and availability generally.--In anticipation of the United States semiquincentennial and to the extent that funding is available, the department shall develop and make available to each school entity guidelines regarding "What Is Your Pennsylvania Story" that the school entity may implement for instruction in social studies.(b) Information and strategies.--The department shall develop the guidelines in a manner that provides professional educators who teach social studies with information and strategies to be incorporated into instruction for the 2025-2026 and 2026-2027 school years to encourage students to share their "What Is Your Pennsylvania Story" as the United States approaches its semiquincentennial.20250HB0354PN2000 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Purpose.--The guidelines shall:(1) Enhance the ability of students to interact effectively with one another as students in each county of this Commonwealth with unique backgrounds united by one nation.(2) Encourage students to become more historically and culturally aware of the unique heritage of religious freedoms in this Commonwealth.(d) Mandatory contents.--The guidelines must include:(1) The unique heritage of religious freedom of this Commonwealth, beginning with the voyage of William Penn to Pennsylvania.(2) The relationship between religious freedom and the development of the Constitution of the United States.(3) Information on the United States and its progression as a nation since 1776.(4) Students' experiences with how the students and their families have navigated within the democracy of the United States and embraced religious freedoms in the United States.(5) The ability for students to share their "What Is Your Pennsylvania Story."(6) The unique cultural differences of students that stem from their ancestral family journeys to the United States.(e) Discretionary contents.--The guidelines may include:(1) Materials that educate students by introducing the students to various cultures through the stories that students relay about who the students are and how their families weave into the Pennsylvania and United States 20250HB0354PN2000 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 experience.(2) Teaching aids that allow students to explore cultures through food, art, books, movies, dance, traditions and cross-cultural experiences.(3) Resources that allow students to explore the cultural experiences of other people and the history, present-day experiences and connections related to American culture.(4) Educational aids that provide students with information on the historical experiences of the inhabitants of this Commonwealth, including their experiences arriving in this Commonwealth and development over the years.(f) Notice.--Each school entity shall provide notice to all parents and guardians of students in the school entity using normal school communication procedures of the opportunity to contribute to the guidelines.Section 4. Expiration.This act shall expire at the conclusion of the 2026-2027 school year.Section 5. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.SECTION 1. SHORT TITLE.THIS ACT SHALL BE KNOWN AND MAY BE CITED AS THE "WHAT IS YOUR PENNSYLVANIA STORY" ACT.SECTION 2. DEFINITIONS.THE FOLLOWING WORDS AND PHRASES WHEN USED IN THIS ACT SHALL HAVE THE MEANINGS GIVEN TO THEM IN THIS SECTION UNLESS THE CONTEXT CLEARLY INDICATES OTHERWISE:"DEPARTMENT." THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION OF THE COMMONWEALTH.20250HB0354PN2000 - 4 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "SCHOOL ENTITY." A SCHOOL DISTRICT, INTERMEDIATE UNIT, AREA CAREER AND TECHNICAL SCHOOL, CHARTER SCHOOL, CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL OR REGIONAL CHARTER SCHOOL."SOCIAL STUDIES." AS DEFINED IN 22 PA. CODE § 4.12(A)(3) (RELATING TO ACADEMIC STANDARDS)."WHAT IS YOUR PENNSYLVANIA STORY." THE CELEBRATION OF THE UNIQUE LIVED EXPERIENCES OF A STUDENT AND THE STUDENT'S FAMILY LIVING IN THIS COMMONWEALTH.SECTION 3. PURPOSE.(A) PURPOSE.--IN ANTICIPATION OF AMERICA CELEBRATING 250 YEARS OF INDEPENDENCE IT IS A GOOD OCCASION TO REFLECT ON OUR NATION'S PAST, HONOR THE CONTRIBUTIONS OF ALL AMERICANS AND LOOK AHEAD TO THE FUTURE. PENNSYLVANIA PLAYED A UNIQUE ROLE IN THE FORMATION OF THE NATION AND THAT ROLE SHOULD BE HIGHLIGHTED IN COORDINATION WITH STUDENT'S EXPERIENCES IN WHAT UNITES US AS PENNSYLVANIANS.(B) STUDENT OBJECTIVES.--STUDENTS SHOULD BE ENCOURAGED:(1) TO INTERACT WITH ONE ANOTHER AS STUDENTS WITH UNIQUE BACKGROUNDS UNITED BY ONE NATION AND SHARE THEIR "WHAT IS YOUR PENNSYLVANIA STORY".(2) TO DEVELOP A HISTORICAL UNDERSTANDING OF THE UNIQUE HERITAGE OF RELIGIOUS FREEDOMS IN THIS COMMONWEALTH INCLUDING THE VOYAGE OF WILLIAM PENN TO PENNSYLVANIA, THE DEVELOPMENT OF THE CONSTITUTION OF THE UNITED STATES AND ITS HISTORY SINCE 1776.(C) MATERIALS.--THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEVELOP AND MAKE AVAILABLE TO SCHOOL ENTITIES MATERIALS WHICH A SCHOOL ENTITY MAY INCORPORATE INTO SOCIAL STUDIES INSTRUCTION. A SCHOOL ENTITY MAY NOT USE THE MATERIALS IN A MANNER THAT IMPACTS ANY CURRICULUM REQUIREMENTS. THE MATERIALS MAY INCLUDE:20250HB0354PN2000 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) RESOURCES THAT EDUCATE STUDENTS BY INTRODUCING THE STUDENTS TO VARIOUS CULTURES THROUGH THE STORIES THAT STUDENTS RELAY ABOUT WHO THE STUDENTS ARE AND HOW THEIR FAMILIES WEAVE INTO THE PENNSYLVANIA AND UNITED STATES EXPERIENCE.(2) TEACHING AIDS THAT ALLOW STUDENTS TO EXPLORE CULTURES THROUGH FOOD, ART, BOOKS, MOVIES, DANCE, TRADITIONS AND EXPERIENCES.(3) EDUCATIONAL AIDS THAT PROVIDE STUDENTS WITH INFORMATION ON THE HISTORICAL EXPERIENCES OF THE INHABITANTS OF THIS COMMONWEALTH, INCLUDING THEIR EXPERIENCES ARRIVING IN THIS COMMONWEALTH AND DEVELOPMENT OVER THE YEARS.SECTION 4. EXPIRATION.THIS ACT SHALL EXPIRE JUNE 30, 2027.SECTION 5. EFFECTIVE DATE.THIS ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT IN 30 DAYS.20250HB0354PN2000 - 6 - 12345678910111213141516